test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-rakt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - rakt: # Verb 'eng dig/fin kaivaa' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/rakt/
     rakt+V+TV+Inf: rakt
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg1: rakšu
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg2: raksi
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl1: raksim
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl2: raksiet
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Fut+SP3: raks
     rakt+V+TV+Quo+Fut: rakšot
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rakts
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: rakta
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: raktam
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: raktu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: raktā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: rakti
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: raktu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: raktiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: raktus
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: raktos
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: raktais
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: raktā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: raktajam
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: rakto
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: raktajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: raktais
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: raktie
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: rakto
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: raktajiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: raktos
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: raktajos
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: raktie
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: rakta
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: raktas
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: raktai
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: raktu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: raktā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: raktas
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: raktu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: raktām
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: raktas
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: raktās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: raktā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: raktās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: raktajai
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: rakto
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: raktajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: raktā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: raktās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: rakto
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: raktajām
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: raktās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: raktajās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: raktās
#"Declension":"4"
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: rakšana
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: rakšanas
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: rakšanai
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: rakšanu
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: rakšanā
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: rakšana
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: rakšanas
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: rakšanu
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: rakšanām
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: rakšanas
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: rakšanās
     rakt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: rakšanas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rakdams
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: rakdama
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: rakdami
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: rakdamas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: rokot
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1: roku
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2: roc
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1: rokam
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2: rokat
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3: rok
     rakt+V+TV+Deb+Prs: jārok
     rakt+V+TV+Quo+Prs: rokot
     rakt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: roc
     rakt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: rociet
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rokošs
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: rokoša
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: rokošam
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: rokošu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: rokošā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: rokoši
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: rokošu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: rokošiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: rokošus
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: rokošos
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: rokošais
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: rokošā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: rokošajam
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: rokošo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: rokošajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [rokošais, rokošo]
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: rokošie
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: rokošo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: rokošajiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: rokošos
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: rokošajos
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: rokošie
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: rokoša
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: rokošas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: rokošai
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: rokošu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: rokošā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: rokošas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: rokošu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: rokošām
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: rokošas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: rokošās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: rokošā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: rokošās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: rokošajai
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: rokošo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: rokošajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: rokošā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: rokošās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: rokošo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: rokošajām
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: rokošās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: rokošajās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: rokošās
     rakt+V+TV+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rokams
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: rokama
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: rokamam
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: rokamu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: rokamā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: rokami
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: rokamu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: rokamiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: rokamus
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: rokamos
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: rokamais
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: rokamā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: rokamajam
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: rokamo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: rokamajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [rokamais, rokamo]
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: rokamie
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: rokamo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: rokamajiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: rokamos
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: rokamajos
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: rokamie
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: rokama
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: rokamas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: rokamai
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: rokamu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: rokamā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: rokamas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: rokamu
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: rokamām
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: rokamas
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: rokamās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: rokamā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: rokamās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: rokamajai
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: rokamo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: rokamajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: rokamā
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: rokamās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: rokamo
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: rokamajām
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: rokamās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: rokamajās
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: rokamās
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: raku
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: raki
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: rakām
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: rakāt
     rakt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: raka
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: racis
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: rakuša
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: rakušam
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: rakušu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: rakušā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: rakuši
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: rakušu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: rakušiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: rakušus
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: rakušos
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: rakušais
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: rakušā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: rakušajam
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: rakušo
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: rakušajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: rakušais
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: rakušie
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: rakušo
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: rakušajiem
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: rakušos
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: rakušajos
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: rakušie
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: rakusi
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: rakušas
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: rakušai
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: rakušu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: rakušā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: rakušas
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: rakušu
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: rakušām
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: rakušas
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: rakušās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: rakusī
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: rakušās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: rakušajai
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: rakušo
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: rakušajā
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: rakusī
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: rakušās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: rakušo
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: rakušajām
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: rakušās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: rakušajās
     rakt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: rakušās
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: raciens
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: raciena
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: racienam
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: racienu
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: racienā
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [raciens, racien]
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: racieni
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: racienu
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: racieniem
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: racienus
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: racienos
     rakt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: racieni
     rakt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: rokam
     rakt+V+TV+Cond: raktu
     rakt+V+TV+Deb+Quo: jārokot
